Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202572-2401
Ferguson House Fund; created; use; investment.

The Ferguson House Fund is created. The fund shall be used by the state building division of the Department of Administrative Services only for the operation, administration, maintenance, restoration, and renovation of the Ferguson House and grounds. Revenue credited to the fund may consist of rental or other income related to the Ferguson House as well as gifts, grants, and bequests. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2005, LB 426, § 8;

Laws 2025, LB264, § 157.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.